Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-203 Definitions. For purposes
of this part:

"Counterparty" means the insurer that
cedes risk to a special purpose financial captive insurance company which,
unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, shall be the parent or an
affiliated entity of the special purpose financial captive insurance company.

"Insolvency" or "insolvent",
for the purpose of applying the provisions of article 15 to a special purpose
financial captive insurance company, means:

(1) That the special purpose financial captive
insurance company is unable to pay its obligations when due, unless those
obligations are the subject of a bona fide dispute; or

(2) That the special purpose financial captive
insurance company has failed to meet all the criteria and conditions for
solvency of the special purpose financial captive insurance company established
by the commissioner by rule or order.

"Insurance securitization" and
"securitization" mean a transaction or a group of related
transactions, which may include capital market offerings, that are effected
through related risk transfer instruments and facilitating administrative
agreements, where all or part of the result of the transactions is used to fund
the special purpose financial captive insurance company's obligations to the
counterparty under the special purpose financial captive insurance company
contract in accordance with the terms of the transaction, and by which:

(1) Proceeds are obtained by a special purpose
financial captive insurance company, directly or indirectly, through the
issuance of securities by the special purpose financial captive insurance
company or any person; or

(2) A person provides one or more letters of credit
or other assets for the benefit of the special purpose financial captive
insurance company that the commissioner authorizes the special purpose
financial captive insurance company to treat as admitted assets for the
purposes of the special purpose financial captive insurance company's annual
report and where all or any part of the proceeds, letters of credit, or assets,
as applicable, are used to fund the special purpose financial captive insurance
company's obligations under the special purpose financial captive insurance
company contract with a counterparty.

The terms "insurance securitization" and
"securitization" do not include the issuance of a letter of credit
for the benefit of the commissioner to satisfy all or part of the special
purpose financial captive insurance company's capital and surplus requirements
under section 431:19-104.

"Management" means the board of
directors, managing board, or other individual or individuals vested with
overall responsibility for the management of the affairs of the special purpose
financial captive insurance company, including but not limited to officers or
agents elected or appointed to act on behalf of the special purpose financial
captive insurance company.

"Special purpose financial captive
insurance company" means a captive insurance company that has received a
certificate of authority from the commissioner to operate as a special purpose
financial captive insurance company pursuant to this part.

"Special purpose financial captive
insurance company contract" means a contract between the special purpose
financial captive insurance company and the counterparty pursuant to which the
special purpose financial captive insurance company agrees to provide insurance
or reinsurance protection to the counterparty for risks associated with the
counterparty's insurance or reinsurance business.

"Special purpose financial captive
insurance company security" means a security defined in section 485A-102,
and shall also include any other form of debt obligation, equity, surplus
certificate, surplus note, funding agreement, derivative, or other financial instrument
that the commissioner designates, by rule or order, as a security, and that is
issued by a special purpose financial captive insurance company, or a third
party, where the proceeds from the security are obtained directly or indirectly
by a special purpose financial captive insurance company.

"Surplus note" means an unsecured
subordinated debt obligation possessing characteristics consistent with
paragraph 3 of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Statement of
Statutory Accounting Principles No. 41, as amended from time to time by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and as modified or
supplemented by rule or order of the commissioner. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1; am
L 2012, c 253, §20]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next